Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.450

Public record. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Public record" has the definition in RCW 42.56.010.

[ 2024 c 164 s 245.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.